District of Columbia statutes.
42-3203

Notice of termination — Tenancies at will.

A tenancy at will may be terminated by 30 days notice in writing by either landlord or tenant.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1382, ch. 854, § 1220

Cross References

Alterations to units after notice to vacate, prohibition, see § 6-731.01 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1403.
1973 Ed., § 45-903.